Illinois, session 104th, HB4915.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Senior Citizens Real Estate Tax Deferral 5Act is amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 30/3)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 453)7    Sec. 3. A taxpayer may, on or before March 1 of each year, 8apply to the county collector of the county where his 9qualifying property is located, or to the official designated 10by a unit of local government to collect special assessments 11on the qualifying property, as the case may be, for a deferral 12of all or a part of real estate taxes payable during that year 13for the preceding year in the case of real estate taxes other 14than special assessments, or for a deferral of any 15installments payable during that year in the case of special 16assessments, on all or part of his qualifying property. The 17application shall be on a form prescribed by the Department 18and furnished by the collector, (a) showing that the applicant 19will be 65 years of age or older by June 1 of the year for 20which a tax deferral is claimed, (b) describing the property 21and verifying that the property is qualifying property as 22defined in Section 2, (c) certifying that the taxpayer has 23owned and occupied as his residence such property or other   HB4915- 2 -LRB104 16363 HLH 30330 b1qualifying property in the State for at least the last 3 years 2except for any periods during which the taxpayer may have 3temporarily resided in a nursing or sheltered care home, and 4(d) specifying whether the deferral is for all or a part of the 5taxes, and, if for a part, the amount of deferral applied for. 6As to qualifying property not having a separate assessed 7valuation, the taxpayer shall also file with the county 8collector a written appraisal of the property prepared by a 9qualified real estate appraiser together with a certificate 10signed by the appraiser stating that he has personally 11examined the property and setting forth the value of the land 12and the value of the buildings thereon occupied by the 13taxpayer as his residence. The county collector may use 14eligibility for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment 15Freeze Homestead Exemption under Section 15-172 of the 16Property Tax Code as qualification for items (a) and (c). 17    The collector shall grant the tax deferral provided such 18deferral does not exceed funds available in the Senior 19Citizens Real Estate Deferred Tax Revolving Fund and provided 20that the owner or owners of such real property have entered 21into a tax deferral and recovery agreement with the collector 22on behalf of the county or other unit of local government, 23which agreement expressly states:24    (1) That the total amount of taxes deferred under this 25Act, plus interest, for the year for which a tax deferral is 26claimed as well as for those previous years for which taxes are   HB4915- 3 -LRB104 16363 HLH 30330 b1not delinquent and for which such deferral has been claimed 2may not exceed 80% of the taxpayer's equity interest in the 3property for which taxes are to be deferred and that, if the 4total deferred taxes plus interest equals 80% of the 5taxpayer's equity interest in the property, the taxpayer shall 6thereafter pay the annual interest due on such deferred taxes 7plus interest so that total deferred taxes plus interest will 8not exceed such 80% of the taxpayer's equity interest in the 9property. Effective as of the January 1, 2011 assessment year 10or tax year 2012 and through the 2021 tax year, the total 11amount of any such deferral shall not exceed $5,000 per 12taxpayer in each tax year. For the 2022 tax year and every tax 13year after, the total amount of any such deferral shall not 14exceed $7,500 per taxpayer in each tax year. 15    (2) That any real estate taxes deferred under this Act and 16taxes paid by the Department of Revenue under this Act and any 17interest accrued thereon are a lien on the real estate and 18improvements thereon until paid and that the real estate taxes 19deferred under this Act and taxes paid by the Department of 20Revenue under this Act, together with all interest and costs 21that may accrue on those amounts, shall be a prior and first 22lien on the property, superior to all other liens and 23encumbrances, until the deferred taxes and taxes paid by the 24Department of Revenue, interest, and costs are paid in 25accordance with this Act.. If the taxes deferred are for a tax 26year prior to 2023, then interest shall accrue at the rate of   HB4915- 4 -LRB104 16363 HLH 30330 b16% per year. If the taxes deferred are for the 2023 tax year or 2any tax year thereafter, then interest shall accrue at the 3rate of 3% per year. No sale or transfer of such real property 4may be legally closed and recorded until the taxes which would 5otherwise have been due on the property, plus accrued 6interest, have been paid unless the collector certifies in 7writing that an arrangement for prompt payment of the amount 8due has been made with his office. The same shall apply if the 9property is to be made the subject of a contract of sale. 10    (3) That upon the death of the taxpayer claiming the 11deferral the heirs-at-law, assignees or legatees shall have 12first priority to the real property upon which taxes have been 13deferred by paying in full the total taxes which would 14otherwise have been due, plus interest. However, if such 15heir-at-law, assignee, or legatee is a surviving spouse, the 16tax deferred status of the property shall be continued during 17the life of that surviving spouse if the spouse is 55 years of 18age or older within 6 months of the date of death of the 19taxpayer and enters into a tax deferral and recovery agreement 20before the time when deferred taxes become due under this 21Section. Any additional taxes deferred, plus interest, on the 22real property under a tax deferral and recovery agreement 23signed by a surviving spouse shall be added to the taxes and 24interest which would otherwise have been due, and the payment 25of which has been postponed during the life of such surviving 26spouse, in determining the 80% equity requirement provided by   HB4915- 5 -LRB104 16363 HLH 30330 b1this Section.2    (4) That if the taxes due, plus interest, are not paid by 3the heir-at-law, assignee or legatee or if payment is not 4postponed during the life of a surviving spouse, the deferred 5taxes and interest shall be recovered from the estate of the 6taxpayer within one year of the date of his death. In addition, 7deferred real estate taxes and any interest accrued thereon 8are due within 90 days after any tax deferred property ceases 9to be qualifying property as defined in Section 2.10    If payment is not made when required by this Section, 11foreclosure proceedings may be instituted under the Property 12Tax Code.13    (5) That any joint owner has given written prior approval 14for such agreement, which written approval shall be made a 15part of such agreement.16    (6) That a guardian for a person under legal disability 17appointed for a taxpayer who otherwise qualifies under this 18Act may act for the taxpayer in complying with this Act.19    (7) That a taxpayer or his agent has provided to the 20satisfaction of the collector, sufficient evidence that the 21qualifying property on which the taxes are to be deferred is 22insured against fire or casualty loss for at least the total 23amount of taxes which have been deferred.24    If the taxes to be deferred are special assessments, the 25unit of local government making the assessments shall forward 26a copy of the agreement entered into pursuant to this Section   HB4915- 6 -LRB104 16363 HLH 30330 b1and the bills for such assessments to the county collector of 2the county in which the qualifying property is located.3    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 4real estate taxes deferred under this Act and taxes paid by the 5Department of Revenue under this Act, together with all 6interest and costs that may accrue on those amounts, shall be a 7prior and first lien on the property, superior to all other 8liens and encumbrances, until the deferred taxes and taxes 9paid by the Department of Revenue, interest, and costs are 10paid in accordance with this Act. 11(Source: P.A. 104-452, eff. 12-12-25.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.